California statutes. Insurance Code
 certificates—the American Men Ultimate Table of Mortality, with Bowerman’s or Davis’ Extension thereof, or, at the option of the society, the Commissioners 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table or the Commissioners 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, using actual age of the insured for male risks and an age not more than six years younger than the actual age of the insured for female risks, and for such policies issued on or after the operative date of Section 10163.2 (i) the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, or (ii) at the election of the company for any one or more specified plans of life insurance, the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors, or (iii) any ordinary mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or its successor, that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such
 policies.

(2) For all industrial life insurance certificates issued on the standard basis, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in such certificates—the 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table, for such certificates issued prior to the operative date of Section 10163.2, and for such policies issued on or after such operative date, the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table or any industrial mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or its successor, that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies.

(3) For annuity and pure endowment certificates, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in such certificates—the 1937 Standard Annuity Mortality Table, or the Annuity Mortality
 Table for 1949 Ultimate, or the Individual Annuity Mortality Table for 1971, or any individual annuity mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or its successor, that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such contracts, or any modification of any of these tables approved by the commissioner.

(4) For disability benefits in or supplementary to ordinary certificates—Hunter’s Disability Table or the Class 3 Disability Table (1926), modified to conform to the contractual waiting period, or the tables of Period 2 disablement rates and the 1930 to 1950 termination rates of the 1952 Disability Study of the Society of Actuaries with due regard to the type of benefit, or the 1964 Commissioners Disability Table, or any tables of disablement rates and termination rates, adopted after 1980 by the National
 Association of Insurance Commissioners, or its successor, that are approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies. Any such table shall, for active lives, be combined with a mortality table permitted for calculating the reserves for life insurance certificates.

(5) For accidental death benefits in or supplementary to certificates—The Inter-Company Double Indemnity Mortality Table or the 1959 Accidental Death Benefits Table, or any accidental death benefits table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or its successor, that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies. Any such table shall be combined with a mortality table permitted for calculating the reserves for life insurance certificates.

(6) For temporary accident and health benefits in or supplementary to certificates—Class 3 Disability Table (1926) with Conference Modifications or the 1964 Commissioners Disability Table, or any tables of disablement rates and termination rates, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or its successor, that are approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies.

(7) For life insurance issued upon the substandard basis and other special benefits—such tables as may be approved by the commissioner.

(c) The commissioner may, in his discretion, accept other standards for valuation if he finds that the reserves produced thereby will not be less in the aggregate than reserves computed in
 accordance with the minimum valuation standard prescribed. Whenever the mortality experience under the certificates valued on the same mortality table is in excess of the expected mortality according to such table for a period of three consecutive years, the commissioner may require additional reserves when in his judgment deemed necessary on account of such certificates.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b), any society, with the consent of the insurance supervisory official of the state of domicile of the society, and under such conditions, if any, which he may impose, may establish and maintain reserves on its certificates in excess of the reserves required thereunder, but the contractual rights of any insured member shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 12.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11137.

Whenever the commissioner finds from any financial statement or valuation report made to him or her by any society authorized to do business in this state or from a filed report on examination of any such society that the admitted assets of the society are less than the sum of its required reserves and accrued liabilities, the commissioner shall determine the amount of that deficiency and shall issue a written requisition to the society to remove, repair, or make good that deficiency within such period as he or she shall designate, not less than 30 days nor more than six months from the service of the requisition, except that if the commissioner believes the interests of the certificate holders of such society will best be served by extending the period of time beyond six months, he or she may do so for such period or periods of time as he or she in his or her discretion deems best. The commissioner may also by official order prohibit the society, while that deficiency exists, from issuing any new contracts of insurance in this state, and in case of a domestic society, from issuing any new contracts in this state or elsewhere. If the society fails or is unable to make good the deficiency within the time specified in the order, the commissioner shall proceed against the society under the provisions of Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 on the ground that its further transaction of business will be hazardous to its certificate holders, its creditors, or the public. In the case of a foreign society the commissioner may also, or in lieu of that proceeding, revoke its certificate of authority to do business in this state or refuse to issue a renewal certificate of authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11138.

The commissioner, or any person he may appoint, shall have the power of visitation and examination into the affairs of any domestic society. He may employ assistants for the purpose of such examination, and he, or any person he may appoint, shall have free access to all the books, papers and documents that relate to the business of the society. The minutes of the proceedings of the supreme governing or legislative body and of the board of directors or corresponding body of a society shall be in the English language. In making any such examination the commissioner may summon and qualify as witnesses under oath and examine its officers, agents and employees or other persons in relation to the affairs, transactions and condition of the society. The report of the commissioner or in his discretion a summary thereof, and such recommendations or statements of the commissioner as may accompany such report, shall be read at the first meeting of the board of directors or corresponding body of the society following the receipt thereof, and if directed so to do by the commissioner shall also be read at the first meeting of the supreme legislative or governing body of the society following the receipt thereof. The expense of each examination and of each valuation, including compensation and actual expense of examiners, shall be paid by the society examined or whose certificates are valued, upon statements furnished by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 209, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11139.

No report of examination shall be adopted by the commissioner or filed by him as an official document except after a notice is given and a hearing held thereon, if demanded, in accordance with the provisions of Section 11141. The commissioner in his determination made upon the basis of his findings from the record of such hearing may direct the society to comply with such recommendations or take such other corrective steps as may be contained therein. In any action or proceeding in the name of the commissioner or instituted in his behalf against the society, such report, if adopted by the commissioner and filed as an official document shall be admissible in evidence and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein. Nothing herein contained shall preclude the commissioner from instituting any proceeding under Section 11137 of this chapter at any time or from using as proof in such proceeding any report of examination or part thereof, whether or not such report has been adopted and filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11140.

The commissioner, or any person whom he may appoint, may examine any foreign society, transacting or applying for admission to transact business in this State. He may employ assistants and he, or any person he may appoint, shall have free access to all books, papers and documents that relate to the business of the society. He may summon, qualify as witnesses under oath and examine any persons in relation to the affairs, transactions and condition of the society. He may in his discretion accept, in lieu of such examination, the examination of the insurance department of the state, territory, district, province or country where such society is organized. The compensation and actual expenses of the examiners making any examination or general or special valuation shall be paid by the society examined or by the society whose certificates obligations have been valued, upon statements furnished by the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11141.

Pending, during or after an examination or investigation of a society, either domestic or foreign, the commissioner shall make public no financial statement, report or finding, nor shall he permit to become public any financial statement, report or finding affecting the status, standing or rights of any society, until a copy thereof shall have been served upon the society at its principal office and the society shall have been afforded a reasonable opportunity to answer any such financial statement, report or finding, and to make such showing in connection therewith as it may desire.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11142.

No person shall cause or permit to be made, issued or circulated in any form:

(a) Any misrepresentation or false or misleading statement concerning the terms, benefits or advantages of any fraternal insurance contract now issued or to be issued in this State; or the financial condition of any society or the legal reserve system upon which it operates; or any other matter concerning any society;

(b) Any false or misleading estimate or statement concerning the dividends or shares of surplus paid or to be paid by any society on any insurance contract; or

(c) Any incomplete comparison of an insurance contract of one society with an insurance contract of another society or insurer for the purpose of inducing the lapse, forfeiture or surrender of any insurance contract.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11143.

A comparison of insurance contracts is incomplete if it does not compare in detail:

(a) The gross rates, and the gross rates less any dividend or other reduction allowed at the date of the comparison;

(b) Any increase in cash values, and all the benefit provided by each contract for the possible duration thereof as determined by the life expectancy of the insured.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11144.

A comparison of insurance contracts is incomplete if it omits from consideration:

(a) Any benefit or value provided in the contract,

(b) Any differences as to amount or period of premiums or payments,

(c) Any differences in limitations or conditions or provisions which directly or indirectly affect the benefits.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11145.

In any determination of the incompleteness or misleading character of any comparison or statement, it shall be presumed that the insured had no knowledge of any of the contents of the contract involved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11146.

Any person who violates any provision of Sections 11142 to 11145 or knowingly receives any compensation or commission by or in consequence of such violation, shall upon conviction be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 183.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Violations and Penalties [11160. - 11165.]

11160.

Compensation shall not be paid to any employee or officer by whatever name known of either of the parties to any contract of merger, consolidation or reinsurance for directly or indirectly aiding in effecting such contract. Except as fully expressed in such contract or itemized statement of expenses approved by the supervising insurance authorities, compensation for negotiating, aiding or promoting such a consolidation, merger or reinsurance shall not be paid to any person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11161.

Any person violating Section 11160 is guilty of a felony and punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 214.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

11162.

It is a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, for any officer, director, agent or employee of any fraternal benefit society to, directly or indirectly, for himself or as partner or agent of others:

(a) Borrow any of the funds of such society.

(b) Become endorser or surety for loans by the society to others.

(c) In any manner be obligor for moneys borrowed or loaned by such society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 215.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.

It is a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, for any officer, trustee, agent or employee of a fraternal benefit society to ask, receive, or consent or agree to receive anything of value for procuring or endeavoring to procure a loan to any person from the trust funds of, or funds belonging to, a fraternal benefit society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 216.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

11164.

Any person not authorized pursuant to Section 11013 who solicits membership for, or in any manner assists in procuring membership in, any nonadmitted fraternal benefit society is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by fine not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 185.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

11165.

Any person who knowingly or willfully makes any false or fraudulent statement or representation in or with reference to any application for membership, or for the purpose of obtaining money or benefit from any fraternal benefit society is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by fine not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in the county jail not less than 30 days nor exceeding one year, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 186.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10A. Firemen's, Policemen's,or Peace Officers’ Benefit and Relief Associations [11400. - 11407.]

11400.

Firemen's, policemen’s or peace officers’ benefit and relief associations now existing, or that may be formed hereafter for the purpose of aiding their members or dependents of their members in case of sickness, accident, distress, or death, shall be subject to this chapter, to the extent not preempted by the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA). An
 association
 that operates strictly in accordance with this chapter shall not be subject to any other provision of this code or to any law of this state relating to insurance, whether now existing or hereafter enacted, except when expressly designated
 in that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.

(a) An association shall not operate or do business in this state without a certificate of authority. The commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to any association unless the commissioner determines, after examination, that it does not comply with the provisions of this chapter. The filing fee for the application for the certificate of authority shall be one thousand four hundred ten dollars ($1,410).

(b) An association shall renew its certificate of authority within 30 days after a change in name or address or before a merger.

(c) (1) The commissioner may revoke the certificate of authority
 for an association that failed to renew its certificate of authority in compliance with subdivision (b), after giving reasonable written notice mailed to the last address of the association registered with the department.

(2) The commissioner may revoke the certificate of authority for an association that has a dissolved, suspended, or otherwise inactive status according to the records of the Secretary of State, after giving reasonable written notice mailed to the last address of the association registered with the department.

(3) To obtain a reissue of a certificate of authority revoked pursuant to this subdivision, an association shall apply to the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 444, Sec. 6.   (SB 577)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.5.

(a) (1) Each association that holds a certificate of authority pursuant to this chapter and that issues long-term disability or long-term care policies or contracts shall submit to the commissioner the opinion of a qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items that support the policies or contracts issued pursuant to this chapter, including policies and contracts issued by entities established by these associations that provide benefits described in this chapter, are expected to be adequate to satisfy contractual provisions, are based on reasonable assumptions, and are based on actuarial standards of practice published by the American Academy of Actuaries and the Actuarial Standards Board. An
 association that holds a certificate of authority pursuant to this chapter shall file its opinion no later than July 1, 2021, and that opinion shall have been completed no earlier than December 31, 2019. Thereafter, an association shall submit a new actuary opinion to the commissioner within no more than four years from the date of its last opinion on file with the commissioner.

(2) An association is considered to have issued a long-term care or disability policy or contract if it self-funds all or part of the resulting obligation. An association that markets long-term policies or contracts issued by an insurer that is admitted by the department to offer insurance products in the state is exempt from this reporting requirement.

(3) An association seeking a certificate of
 authority pursuant to this chapter shall file an opinion, to the extent feasible, that establishes that it would have adequate resources to provide benefits described in this chapter as required to satisfy its proposed contractual obligations.

(b) The opinion required by subdivision (a) shall include supporting memoranda from the same qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts, when considered in light of the assets held by the association with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items, including, but not limited to, the investment earnings on the assets and the considerations anticipated to be received and retained under the policies and contracts, shall make adequate provision for the association’s obligations under the policies and contracts, including,
 but not limited to, the benefits and any administrative and operating expenses associated with the policies and contracts.

(c) The opinion required by subdivision (a) shall be governed by the following provisions:

(1) It shall include supporting memoranda consistent with actuarial standards of practice published by the American Academy of Actuaries and the Actuarial Standards Board.

(2) If the association fails to provide an opinion and supporting memoranda to the commissioner that meets the requirements of this section, the commissioner shall notify the association of the deficiencies in the filing, and shall make a specific request that identifies the issues that should be addressed in an amended filing. The
 requests shall be consistent with actuarial standards of practice published by the American Academy of Actuaries and the Actuarial Standards Board.

(d) Documents, materials, or other information, including the opinion with supporting memoranda, submitted pursuant to this section that are in the possession or control of the Department of Insurance and that are obtained by, created by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person pursuant to this section, are recognized by this state as being proprietary and to contain trade secrets. Those documents, materials, or other information shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to disclosure by the commissioner pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and shall not be
 subject to subpoena or discovery from the commissioner or admissible into evidence, in a private civil action if obtained from the commissioner. The commissioner shall not otherwise make those documents, materials, or other information public without the prior written consent of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 313.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.6.

An association that self-funds all or part of the benefits provided under this chapter shall include the following language, or other language approved by the commissioner, in all contracts that are not regulated by the department, and in certificates evidencing coverage under those contracts, in capital letters and in a minimum of 12-point type:
“ALL OR A PORTION OF THE BENEFITS PROVIDED BY THIS CONTRACT ARE NOT SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE, AND THE CONTRACT IS NOT GUARANTEED BY THE CALIFORNIA LIFE AND HEALTH INSURANCE GUARANTEE ASSOCIATION.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 365, Sec. 3.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.7.

Each association that holds a certificate of authority pursuant to this chapter and that issues long-term disability or long-term care policies or contracts shall, upon written request from a member, make available to that member the contract for benefits, certificate evidencing coverage thereunder, or other plan document that describes the benefits being provided to that member, within 30 days of the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.

Such association may be incorporated or unincorporated, but if incorporated it shall neither issue nor be authorized to issue shares of stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.

The membership of such association shall consist solely of the following or any combination thereof:

(a) Members of police departments of municipal or public corporations or districts.

(b) Members of fire departments of municipal or public corporations or districts.

(c) Peace or law enforcement officers who are regular and salaried officers or employees of the state or of a single county or other political subdivision or public or municipal corporation.

(d) Persons who are emergency medical services personnel and employed by a fire department of a city, county, or district.

(e) Persons who at the time of becoming members of such association were qualified pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 467, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.

Such association shall not pay, promise or agree to pay, either directly or indirectly, any consideration of any nature for the solicitation or procuring of members or applications for membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

11405.

The trustees, directors or governing body of such association, by whatever name their office is known or designated, shall be elected by the membership of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.

Moneys or property directly or indirectly contributed to such association by its members shall not be paid out as benefits to any persons other than its members, their dependents, or beneficiaries nominated in writing by them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

11407.

Such association shall be supported mainly by contributions from its members, whether in the form of fees, dues, assessments, or otherwise, and by donations made to it from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Change by Assessment Plan Insurer to Reserve Plan [11420. - 11490.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization and Effect [11420. - 11422.]

11420.

Any domestic insurer providing life insurance upon the assessment plan may transform itself into an incorporated life insurer issuing policies on a reserve basis with such name as its directors or trustees determine. If incorporated, such insurer may make the transformation by amendment of its articles and by-laws, either by a majority vote of its directors or trustees or in any other lawful manner. If unincorporated it may make the transformation by incorporating.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11421.

After completing such transformation and procuring from the commissioner a certificate of authority to transact business in this State as an incorporated insurer issuing policies on a reserve basis, it may incur the obligations and enjoy the benefits of such insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11422.

The transformed insurer is a continuation of the original insurer. Its officers elected before or during the transformation serve through their respective terms as provided in the articles and by-laws under which they were elected. Their successors shall be elected and serve as the law and its articles and by-laws provide after the transformation. Such transformation shall not affect existing suits, rights or contracts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Capital Adjustments [11440. - 11443.]

11440.

Any insurer so reorganized shall have assets representing a paid-in capital represented by shares of stock apart from any assets described in Section 11441. At least two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) of that capital shall be paid up before the insurer issues any policies on the reserve plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

11441.

All assets belonging before transformation to any such insurer or arising or accruing from policies issued upon the assessment plan, shall be used only for the benefit of the holders of such policies. Such assets shall not be used or considered as any part of the paid in capital provided for by section 11440.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11442.

If, at or after the time of the transformation, it appears, either from the last preceding annual report by such insurer to the commissioner, or from an investigation made by the commissioner, that the present value of the contributions to be received from the holders of policies on the assessment plan, together with all assets owned by the insurer that have been accumulated from assessments paid by members on that plan, are not equal to the present value of the benefits, including all matured liabilities, to be derived by members under the assessment plan, the insurer shall set aside and maintain a fund for the purpose set forth in section 11443. Such fund together with the present value of contributions and assets, shall equal the present value of such benefits.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11443.

The fund required by Section 11442 shall be used for the payment of matured liabilities arising under the assessment plan when other assets applicable thereto are exhausted. It may be derived from the excess over two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) of the paid-in capital of the insurer. It need be maintained only during the existence of conditions set forth in Section 11442.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transfer of Insurance [11460. - 11460.]

11460.

Members of the insurer who are in good standing prior to the transformation may thereafter transfer their insurance, without change of amount and without medical examination, from the assessment plan to the nonassessable reserve basis at the reserve rates. The interest and the assets of the insurer credited to the person so transferring shall become a part of the assets of the insurer on the reserve basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers of Insurer After Transformation [11470. - 11472.]

11470.

The insurer, after such transformation, shall exercise all the rights and powers and perform all the duties conferred or imposed by law upon insurers writing the classes of insurance written by it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11471.

Such insurer shall exercise all the rights and powers and perform all the duties necessary to protect rights and contracts existing prior to reorganization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11472.

The commissioner shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties, concerning any such insurer, that are applicable to domestic insurers issuing policies of the same class. He or she shall issue a certificate of authority to transact the proper classes of insurance in this state to any such insurer which is solvent as to its reserve basis policies under Article 13 (commencing with Section 980) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, and has fully complied with the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 117.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Valuation of Policies [11490. - 11490.]

11490.

Any life insurer which has transformed its business pursuant to this chapter shall value its assessment policies according to the standard of valuation which would be used in the absence of the transformation, and shall value its nonassessable reserve basis policies according to the standard of valuation set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10478) of Chapter 5. The various kinds of insurance written shall be governed by the provisions of this code applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 118.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Grants and Annuities Societies [11520. - 11524.]

11520.

The following organizations and persons may receive transfers of property, conditioned upon their agreement to pay an annuity to the transferor or the transferor’s nominee, after obtaining from the commissioner a certificate of authority so to do:

(a) Any charitable, religious, benevolent or educational organization, pecuniary profit not being its object or purpose, after being in active operation for at least 10 years; provided, nevertheless, that 10 years of active operation shall not be required in case of:

(1) A nonprofit corporation organized and controlled by a hospital licensed by the State Department of Health Services as a general acute care hospital pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code; and

(2) An incorporated educational institution offering courses of instruction beyond high school, organized pursuant to Section 94757 of the Education Code, and which is, and for at least one year has been, qualified pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 94700) of Part 59 of the Education Code to issue diplomas or degrees as defined in Sections 94724 and 94726 of that code;

(b) Every organization or person maintaining homes for the aged for pecuniary profit.

This section applies to organizations subject to and operating under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1770) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 292) and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 292.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11520.5.

A person shall not transact in this state the business described in this chapter without first procuring a certificate of authority from the commissioner for that purpose. Application for that certificate shall be made on a form prescribed by the commissioner accompanied by a filing fee of four thousand two hundred thirty-three dollars ($4,233). The certificate shall not be granted until the applicant conforms to the requirements of this chapter and the laws of this state prerequisite to its issue. After the issuance, the holder shall continue to comply with the requirements of this chapter and the laws of this state. When a hearing is held under this section the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all of
 the powers granted therein.

Subject to the annual fee provisions herein, every certificate of authority issued or held under this chapter shall be for an indefinite term and, unless sooner revoked by the commissioner, shall terminate upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Upon the holder’s ceasing to exist as a separate entity.

(b) Upon the winding up or dissolution, or expiration or forfeiture of the corporate existence of a corporate holder thereof.

(c) Upon winding up or dissolution of a holder not a corporation.

(d) In any event upon surrender by the holder of its certificate of authority and cancellation of the same by the commissioner.

The commissioner
 shall not cancel a surrendered certificate of authority until he or she is satisfied by examination, or otherwise, that the former holder has discharged its annuity liabilities to residents of this state or satisfactorily reinsured the same.

Notwithstanding the preceding provisions for a certificate of authority of indefinite term, each holder of a certificate of authority under this chapter shall owe and pay in advance to the commissioner an annual fee of one hundred thirty-six dollars ($136), on account of a certificate of authority until its final termination or revocation. The fee shall be for annual periods commencing on July 1 of each year and ending on June 30 of each year and shall be due on each March 1 and shall be delinquent on and after each April 1.

Each holder of a certificate of authority shall also be subject to the payment in advance of the following fees, as appropriate:

(1) Two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283) for each amended certificate of authority caused by a change of the name of the holder.

(2) Two hundred twelve dollars ($212) for the services and expenses of the commissioner in connection with the filing of amended articles by a holder.

(3) Eight hundred forty-nine dollars ($849) for all services and expenses of the commissioner in connection with the withdrawal of a holder of a certificate of authority under this chapter.

(e) Upon the receipt of a notice of filing of a petition by or against a certificate holder under the United States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or reorganization, the commissioner shall cease imposing, billing, or collecting the annual fees due under this chapter and this section to the
 certificate holder.

(f) Upon notice of the suspension of the corporate status of the certificate holder for a period of 12 months by the Secretary of State, the commissioner shall terminate the certificate of authority and shall deem the certificate to be terminated.
